Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 5. Small Business Economic Development Revolving Loan Fund.

Administrative Code. —

For small business economic development loan program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 8.

Sec. 44.88.400.
Creation of a small business economic development revolving loan fund.

There is created in the authority a small business economic development revolving loan fund to carry out the purposes of AS

44.88.400

—

44.88.430

, including the administration of a revolving loan fund qualified to receive revolving loan fund grants from the United States Economic Development Administration (EDA) under Title IX of the Public Works and Economic Development Act of 1965, as amended (42 U.S.C. 3121 et seq.).
All money granted to the authority by the United States Economic Development Administration, all money appropriated to the fund, all principal and interest payments, and all money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process on loans made under AS

44.88.400

—

44.88.430

shall be paid into the small business economic development revolving loan fund.

History.

(§ 42 ch 42 SLA 1987)

Sec. 44.88.410.
Special account established.

There is established as a special account within the small business economic development revolving loan fund the foreclosure expense account. This account is established as a reserve from fund equity.

The authority may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the authority’s security interest in collateral on loans made under AS

44.88.420

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after a default by an obligor.

History.

(§ 42 ch 42 SLA 1987)

Sec. 44.88.420.
Powers and duties of the authority.

The authority may

accept United States Economic Development Administration revolving fund grants;

make loans to eligible applicants under the United States Economic Development Administration Long-Term Economic Deterioration (LTED) and Sudden and Severe Economic Dislocation (SSED) programs;

designate agents and delegate powers to them as necessary;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out its functions and to administer programs under United States Economic Development Administration guidelines, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided;

establish amortization plans for the repayment of loans that may include extensions; and

charge and collect the fees established under this subsection.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 42 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For other powers of the authority, see AS

44.88.080

and

44.88.560

.

Administrative Code. —

For small business economic development loan program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 8.

Sec. 44.88.430.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The authority shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure on a loan made under AS

44.88.400

—

44.88.430

.
Disposal shall be made in a manner that serves the best interests of the state and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 42 ch 42 SLA 1987)